Illinois, session 104th, HB5234.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. If and only if House Bill 3564 of the 104th 5General Assembly becomes law, then House Bill 3564 of the 6104th General Assembly is amended by changing Section 99 as 7follows: 8    (H.B. 3564, 104th G.A., Sec. 99)9    Sec. 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 102027 July 1, 2026.11(Source: 10400HB3564sam007.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.